Utah statutes.
63M-7-512.   Reparations reduction.

(1)  Reparations otherwise payable to a claimant may be reduced or denied as follows:

(a)  the economic loss upon which the claim is based has been or could be recouped from other persons, including collateral sources;

(b)  the reparations officer considers the claim unreasonable because of the misconduct of the claimant or of a victim through whom the claimant claims; or

(c)  the victim did not use a facility or health care provider which would be covered by a collateral source.

(2)  When two or more dependents are entitled to an award as a result of a victim's death, the award shall be apportioned by the reparations officer among the dependents.



Amended by Chapter 339, 2008 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

